Missouri, session 2026, HB2590.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 273, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 273.355, to read as follows:
273.355. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Healthy Pets
Act".
2. Commercial breeders shall maintain healthy breeding practices by completing
the following on all animals used for breeding which shall be considered records of
parentage for any animals resulting from a breeding pair:
(1) Genetic testing to screen for genetic disorders common to the specific breed
of animal being tested;
(2) Any vaccinations as recommended by the department of agriculture;
(3) X-ray screening of any dog, as defined in section 273.040, to determine
presence or risk of hip dysplasia;
(4) An annual examination by a licensed veterinarian for the male of a breeding
pair with an accompanying photograph of the animal taken within two weeks before or
after each annual examination;
(5) An examination by a licensed veterinarian of an intact female prior to each
breeding cycle with an accompanying photograph of the animal taken within two weeks
before or after each examination and records of the number of breeding cycles
completed by each intact female;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2590 2
(6) Taking photographs, at least quarterly, of the enclosures where each
individual animal is housed and exercised and recording amounts of time spent in each
location; and
(7) Taking photographs, at least quarterly, of the complex in which all animals
being used for breeding are housed.
3. (1) Commercial breeders shall complete the following prior to selling an
animal to any individual, dealer, or pet shop:
(a) Genetic testing to screen for genetic disorders common to the specific breed
of animal being tested;
(b) Any vaccinations as recommended by the department of agriculture for an
animal being sold or transferred;
(c) X-ray screening of any dog, as defined in section 273.040, to determine
presence or risk of hip dysplasia; and
(d) In the case of any dog, as defined in section 273.040, a review of any records
of socialization with other dogs and people.
(2) The results of such genetic testing, records of vaccination, records of any
medical care and surgeries performed including, but not limited to, x-rays, tail docking,
ear cropping, or prophylactic use of antibiotics, and records of parentage shall be
transferred with the animal to the receiving party.
4. (1) Dealers and pet shops shall not purchase, exchange, or otherwise obtain
animals from any commercial breeder that has been:
(a) Found to be in violation of any state or federal laws or regulations
promulgated by the department of agriculture or the United States Department of
Agriculture relating to the care or keeping of animals within the last three years; or
(b) Found guilty of animal abuse or neglect under section 578.009 or 578.012.
(2) The attorney general shall have concurrent jurisdiction to enforce the
provisions of this subsection. Any dealer or pet shop who knowingly purchases an
animal in violation of this subsection shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor and each
purchase of an animal shall constitute a separate offense. Second and subsequent
violations may be enhanced to a class E felony at the discretion of the attorney general
or prosecuting attorney.
5. Any dealer or pet shop found guilty of a third or subsequent offense under
subsection 4 of this section shall have its license immediately revoked under section
273.329 and shall be prohibited from engaging in the sale of animals.
6. Dealers and pet shops shall not buy, transfer, or exchange animals to a third
party or final consumer without providing:
(1) The results of genetic testing received from the commercial breeder;

HB 2590 3
(2) Records of all vaccinations received from the commercial breeder and any
additional vaccinations recommended by the department of agriculture between the
receipt of animals by dealers or pet shops from dealers or commercial breeders and
their transfer to the final consumer, which shall be completed by the dealer or pet shop
on the vaccination schedule recommended by the department of agriculture;
(3) Records of any medical care and surgeries performed including, but not
limited to, X-rays, tail docking, ear cropping, or prophylactic use of antibiotics; and
(4) Records of parentage.
7. Pet shops shall display prominently on the enclosure of each animal offered
for sale the:
(1) Total purchase price of the animal including, but not limited to, any taxes,
fees, and licensing costs; and
(2) Name, city, state, and license number of the commercial breeder from which
the animal was purchased or otherwise obtained.
8. Each animal purchased from a dealer or pet shop shall be warrantied to be
free from genetic or major medical conditions not caused by physical injury while in the
care and control of the consumer for one year from the date of purchase. If any genetic
or major medical condition manifests prior to the expiration of the warranty period, the
dealer or pet shop shall be liable for:
(1) Reasonable medical costs to treat such genetic or major medical condition;
(2) Euthanasia, if a licensed veterinarian determines it is necessary for the
humane treatment of the animal; or
(3) Return and refund to the consumer at the consumer's discretion.
✔